Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.030

Adoption of plan—Ordinance.

Whenever the legislative body of any city or town, shall deem it advisable that such city or town shall purchase, acquire or construct any public utility mentioned in RCW 35.67.020, or make any additions, betterments, or alterations thereto, or extensions thereof, such legislative body shall provide therefor by ordinance, which shall specify and adopt the system or plan proposed, and declare the estimated cost thereof as near as may be.

[ 1985 c 445 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.67.030. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-5.]

NOTES:

Elections: Title 29A RCW.

Limitations upon indebtedness, how exceeded: State Constitution Art. 7 s 2 (Amendments 55, 59), Art. 8 s 6 (Amendment 27), chapter 39.36 RCW, RCW 84.52.050.